Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 418.475 is amended to read:
418.475. (1) Within the limit of  moneys appropriated therefor, the Department of Human Services
may establish,  license, certify or authorize independent residence facilities for unmarried persons
who:
(a)(A) Are at least 16 years of age and not older than 20 years of age;
(B) Have been placed in at least one substitute care resource;
(C) Have been determined by the department to possess the  skills and level of responsibility
required for the transition to adulthood;
(D) Have received permission from  the appropriate juvenile court, if they are wards of the court;
and
(E) Have been determined by the department to be suitable for  an independent living program;
or
(b)(A) Are at least 16 years of age and not older than 24 years of age;
(B) At any time after attaining 14 years of age experienced homelessness for  an aggregate of
six months;
(C) While experiencing  homelessness as described in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, re-
ceived services from an organization contracted by  the department to provide services to homeless
persons or from a host home, as defined by the department by rule; and
(D) Last received the services described in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph  after attaining
16 years of age.
(2) Independent residence facilities shall provide independent housing arrangements with  coun-
seling services and minimal supervision available from at least one counselor.
(3) Each resident shall be required to maintain a department approved independent living  plan
consisting of education, employment or volunteer activities, or a  combination thereof[ , and shall be
required to pay a portion or all of  the resident’s housing expenses and other support costs. The de-
partment may approve an exception to the requirements of this subsection for reasons  of temporary loss
of employment or of other financial support ].
(4) The department may make payment grants directly to persons enrolled in an independent
living program who, at a  minimum, meet the requirements described in subsection (1)(a)(A) to (C)
or (b) of this section for food, shelter, clothing, transportation and incidental  expenses. The payment
grants shall be subject to an agreement between the person and the department that establishes a
budget of expenses.
Enrolled Senate Bill 944 (SB 944-INTRO) Page 1
(5) The department may establish cooperative  financial management agreements with a person
enrolled in an independent living program and for that purpose may enter into  joint bank accounts
requiring two signatures for  withdrawals. The management agreements or joint accounts may not
subject the department or any counselor involved to any liability for debts or other  responsibilities
of the person.
(6) The department shall make periodic reports to the juvenile court as  required by the court
regarding any ward of the court who is enrolled in an independent living program.
(7) The enrollment of a person in an  independent living program in accordance with the pro-
visions of subsection (1) of this section or making payment grants under subsection (4) of this sec-
tion does not remove or limit in any way the obligation of the  parent of the person to pay support
as ordered by a court under the provisions of ORS 419B.400.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 418.016 is amended to read:
418.016. (1) To protect the health and safety of children who are in the custody of  the Depart-
ment of Human Services and who may be placed in a foster home or adoptive home or  with a rela-
tive caregiver,  the department shall adopt rules pursuant to ORS 181A.195 and ORS chapter 418 to
require that criminal records checks be conducted under ORS 181A.195 on:
(a) All persons who seek to be foster parents, adoptive parents or relative caregivers; and
(b) Any other individuals over 18 years of age who will be in  the household of the foster parent,
adoptive parent or relative caregiver.
(2) Rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section shall include:
(a) A requirement that persons who  have been convicted of crimes listed in the rules adopted
by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services under ORS 181A.215 are disqualified from
becoming a foster parent, adoptive parent or relative caregiver; and
(b) A provision that the Department  of Human Services may approve a person who has been
convicted of certain crimes listed in the rules if the person demonstrates to the department that:
(A) The person possesses the qualifications to be a foster parent or  adoptive parent regardless
of having been convicted of a listed crime; or
(B) The disqualification would create emotional harm to the child for whom the person  is seek-
ing to become a foster parent, adoptive parent or relative caregiver and placement of the child with
the person would be a safe placement that is in the best interests of the child.
(3) The  Department of Human Services by rule may exempt an individual from the
criminal records check  requirement under subsection (1)(b) of this section if the individual
was placed in the household by the department before the individual  attained 18 years of age.
Enrolled Senate Bill 944 (SB 944-INTRO) Page 2
Passed by Senate April 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 3, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 944 (SB 944-INTRO) Page 3